Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-3101 to 38-3133 shall be known and may be cited as the Psychology Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1035;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 44.